Hawaii statutes.
§706-648 Probation services fee. (1)
The court, when sentencing a defendant to probation or granting deferral of a
plea under section 853-1, shall order the defendant to pay a probation services
fee. The amount of the fee shall be as follows:

(a) $150, when the term of probation or period of
deferral is for more than one year; or

(b) $75, when the term of probation or period of
deferral is for one year or less;

provided that no fee shall be ordered when the court
determines that the defendant is unable to pay the fee.

(2) The entire fee ordered or assessed shall
be payable forthwith by cash, check, or by a credit card approved by the
court. When a defendant is also ordered to pay a fine, make restitution, pay a
crime victim compensation fee, or pay other fees in addition to the probation
services fee under subsection (1), payments by the defendant shall be made pursuant
to section 706-651.

(3) Any defendant received for supervision
pursuant to chapter 353B shall be assessed a probation services fee pursuant to
this section.

(4) The defendant shall pay the fee to the
clerk of the court. The fee shall be deposited with the director of finance
who shall transmit the fee to the probation services special fund pursuant to
section 706-649. [L 2000, c 205, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 55, §29; am L 2004, c
78, §2; am L 2012, c 295, §1; am L 2016, c 231, §26]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to any defendant granted a
deferred acceptance of guilty or no contest plea before July 9, 2012. L 2012,
c 295, §3.

COMMENTARY ON §706-648

Act 205, Session Laws 2000, added this section to require a
court, when sentencing a defendant to probation, to order the defendant to pay
a probation services fee. The legislature found that this was necessary to
help defray the costs of administering probation services. Conference
Committee Report No. 45, Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3375.

Act 78, Session Laws 2004, amended this section to change the
reference to the Interstate Parole and Probation Compact codified as part III
of chapter 353 and repealed by Act 78, to reflect the new Interstate Compact
for the Supervision of Adult Offenders, codified as chapter 353B. House
Standing Committee Report No. 176-04.

Act 295, Session Laws 2012, amended this section to
authorize the courts to assess a fee for probation services to all offenders
under the supervision of the adult client services branch, including those
granted deferred acceptance of guilty plea or deferred acceptance of nolo
contendere plea, to hold offenders accountable for their actions and make them
responsible for paying for some of their supervision costs. The legislature
found that in 2000, it established probation services fees to help defray the
costs of administering probation services. However, this fee could not be
ordered for those offenders who are granted deferrals. Act 295 would allow the
courts to collect probation services fees from offenders placed on deferral to
make them accountable for their actions and to help pay for their supervision
costs, and addressed the Judiciary's need for additional revenue to meet the
rising costs of supervising offenders that are not covered by the general
fund. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 2344.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended subsection (2) to
implement recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened
pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next